Arkansas, session 2025, HB1535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 4, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-4-708. Enhanced sentence of chemical castration for certain sex
offenders.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person who commits
rape, § 5-14-103, upon conviction is subject to an enhanced sentence of
chemical castration by medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment to be
administered by the Department of Corrections by a licensed physician if the
*CEB167*
03-10-2025 11:25:03 CEB167

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1535
victim of the offense was twelve (12) years of age or younger.
(b)(1) An order of a court sentencing a defendant to
medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment under this section is contingent upon a
determination by a medical expert appointed by the court that the defendant
is an appropriate candidate for medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment.
(2) The determination of a medical expert under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section shall be made no later than sixty (60) days from the
imposition of sentence.
(3) An order of the court sentencing a defendant to
medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment under this section shall specify the
duration of medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment for a specific term of
years, or in the discretion of the court, up to the life of the defendant.
(c)(1) The department shall provide the services necessary to
administer and monitor medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment under this
section.
(2) If a defendant subject to this section is sentenced to
imprisonment or confinement in an institution, the medroxyprogesterone
acetate treatment under this section shall commence not later than one (1)
week before the defendant's release from prison or the institution.
(3) Medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment shall not be performed
under this section if medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment is not medically
appropriate.
(4) Instead of medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment under this
section, the court may order the defendant to undergo physical castration if
the defendant files a written motion with the court stating that the
defendant intelligently and knowingly gives the defendant's voluntary consent
to physical castration as an alternative to the medroxyprogesterone acetate
treatment.
(d) If a defendant is sentenced to medroxyprogesterone acetate
treatment under this section and knowingly fails to appear for
medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment or knowingly refuses to allow
medroxyprogesterone acetate treatment, upon conviction the defendant is
guilty of a Class Y felony.

/s/Duffield

03-10-2025 11:25:03 CEB167